Louisiana, session 2026, SB450.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:409.3(A) and (C) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
17:409.3(D) and (E) and 416.16.2 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§409.3. Mandatory reporting of threats of violence or threats of terrorism
A.(1) Any administrator, teacher, counselor, bus operator, or other school
employee, whether full-time or part-time, who learns of a threat of violence or threat
of terrorism, whether through oral communication, written communication, or
electronic communication, shall immediately report the threat to a local law
enforcement agency and, if the employee is not the school administrator, to the
school administrator.
(2) A local law enforcement agency that receives a threat report pursuant
to this Section, shall report the threat to the Louisiana Fusion Center within
seven calendar days of receiving the threat. The report to the fusion center shall
not include personally identifiable information for any student or for any
person who reported the threat to law enforcement. The report to the fusion
Page 1 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 450 ENROLLED
center shall only include information relative to the date of the threat, the type
of threat reported, whether the threat was substantiated, and whether any
arrests were made relative to the threat.
(3) The fusion center shall use the threat reports to collect data and
analytics of threats of violence and terrorism for future preparedness.
* * *
C.(1) No person shall have a cause of action against any person for any action
taken or statement made in adherence with the requirement for reporting as provided
in this Subpart. However, the immunity from liability provided in this Subsection
shall not apply to any action or statement if the action or statement was maliciously,
willfully, and deliberately intended to cause harm to, harass, or otherwise deceive
law enforcement or school officials.
(2) No person shall have a cause of action against any local law
enforcement agency for not reporting the threat to the fusion center within
seven calendar days of receiving the threat.
D. As used in this Section, "Louisiana Fusion Center" or "fusion center"
means the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of state police,
Louisiana State Analytical and Fusion Exchange.
E. The reports made to a law enforcement agency or the fusion center
as described in Subsection A of this Section shall constitute records containing
security procedures, investigative techniques, threat or vulnerability
assessments collected or obtained in the prevention of terrorist-related activity
or internal security information for purposes of R.S. 44:3(A)(3).
* * *
§416.16.2. Physical security school assessments; reports
A.(1) Each public elementary and secondary school in each city, parish,
and other local public school district may obtain a physical security school
assessment upon a request made to the fusion center.
(2) No assessment of a school may be conducted more than once every
three years at each elementary or secondary public school, according to a
Page 2 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 450 ENROLLED
schedule approved by the fusion center.
(3) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the fusion
center shall be required to conduct physical security school assessments only
within the limits of funds appropriated or otherwise made available for this
purpose and only to the extent that personnel and resources are available for
this purpose.
(4) A nonpublic school or charter school may obtain a physical security
school assessment upon a request made to the fusion center.
(5) The state Department of Education shall post on its website
information regarding the availability of physical security school assessments.
(6) The fusion center may include in its schedule of assessments available
time slots for which requested assessments may be conducted at nonpublic
schools or charter schools.
(7) The assessment by the fusion center shall be conducted at no costs to
the school, the school district, or the school's governing authority.
B. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(1) "Fusion center" shall have the same meaning as defined in R.S.
17:409.3.
(2) "Options for consideration" means nonbinding upgrades that are
identified during a physical security school assessment that are intended to
assist school officials in evaluating potential actions to enhance campus safety
and security.
(3) "Physical security school assessment" or "assessment" means a site
visit conducted by the fusion center and any report based upon such visit that
is produced for the purpose of identifying safety or security vulnerabilities at
an elementary or secondary school in order to identify ways to enhance the
school's safety and security. The written report of the assessment shall include
options for consideration.
C. The assessments shall include but not be limited to the following:
Page 3 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 450 ENROLLED
(1) Crime Prevention Through Environmental Design (CPTED)
principles.
(2) Best practices from local, state, and federal partners in the
assessment process.
D. Upon completion of the assessment, the fusion center shall provide a
written report of its findings and options for consideration to the school's
emergency response coordinator and the principal. The findings in the written
report shall be aligned with state building codes and any safety rules adopted
by the state fire marshal in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
E.(1) No school shall be required to implement or complete the options
for consideration included in the assessment provided by the fusion center in its
findings.
(2) A school that concurs with the fusion center's findings and options for
consideration may apply for grants under R.S. 29:726.6 to help defray the cost
of any security enhancements identified in the written report of the physical
security school assessment.
F. Physical security school assessments and all related reports, findings,
options for consideration, and any communications connected therewith, shall
constitute records containing security procedures, threat or vulnerability
assessments collected or obtained in the prevention of terrorist-related activity
or internal security information for purposes of R.S. 44:3(A)(3).
G.(1) The findings or options for consideration contained in a physical
security school assessment are advisory only and shall not create a legal duty or
standard of care. However, nothing in this Subsection is intended to prohibit the
use of a physical security school assessment as a defense as authorized in
Subsection J of this Section.
(2) No cause of action shall arise and no liability shall be imposed upon
any school, school district, charter school, nonpublic school, school governing
authority, the Louisiana Fusion Center, or any employee of the school, school
district, charter school, nonpublic school, school governing authority, or the
Page 4 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 450 ENROLLED
fusion center for any act or omission relating to a school's decision to obtain,
accept, reject, modify, delay, or decline to implement any finding, option for
consideration contained in, or related to, a physical security school assessment.
H. The reports, findings, conclusions, or any portion of a physical
security school assessment, including any options for consideration or other
provision of the assessment or any communication related thereto, shall be
deemed a confidential and privileged communication and shall not be:
(1) Subject to discovery, subpoena, or other compelled production in any
civil action or administrative proceeding.
(2) Admitted into evidence by the petitioner or intervener to establish a
standard of care, duty, or breach thereof in any civil action or administrative
proceeding. However, nothing in this Subsection is intended to prohibit the use
of a physical security school assessment as a defense as authorized in Subsection
J of this Section.
I. The immunity and confidentiality protections afforded by this Section
shall apply regardless of whether a school elects to seek, adopt, or decline any
provisions contained in a physical security school assessment or any option for
consideration.
J.(1)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, only the
school, school board, or school governing authority may offer into evidence the
physical security school assessment for the purposes of establishing a defense
against a cause of action for negligence or a breach of duty in a civil proceeding.
The school, school board, or school governing authority may introduce the
assessment in a summary proceeding or an ordinary civil proceeding.
(b) If the cause of action against the school is alleging an unsafe condition
on school property, a school, school board, or governing authority may elect to
introduce into evidence only that portion of the physical security school
assessment that is a defense against the alleged unsafe condition.
(2) A school's substantial compliance with the findings, options for
consideration, or standards identified in the assessment shall create a rebuttable
Page 5 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 450 ENROLLED
presumption that the school property was not unreasonably dangerous and that
the school exercised reasonable care with respect to the school's physical
security and safety.
(3) Evidence of actions taken by the school in reliance on, or in response
to, such assessment shall be admissible as a defense for the purpose of
demonstrating due diligence, reasonable care, and the absence of negligence.
K. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to impose a higher duty of
care upon a school, school board, or school governing authority than that which
is otherwise provided by law, nor be construed to create an independent cause
of action.
Section 2. R.S. 29:726.6(B)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§726.6. Fund and grant program for security measures; eligible applicants
* * *
B. * * *
(2) Eligible schools include public elementary or secondary schools in a city,
parish, or other local public school district or other political subdivision and
nonpublic schools approved by the State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education pursuant to R.S. 17:11. Grant funding shall be prioritized for schools
seeking funds to implement any of the findings or options for consideration
identified in the written reports of physical security school assessments,
pursuant to R.S. 17:416.16.2.
* * *
Section 3. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(9) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
Page 6 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 450 ENROLLED
* * *
(9) R.S. 17:7.2, 46, 47, 81.9, 391.4, 407.28, 407.47, 407.65, 409.3, 416.16.1,
416.16.2, 500.2, 1175, 1202, 1237, 1252, 1948, 1989.7, 2047, 2048.31, 3099, 3100.8,
3136, 3137, 3138.12, 3390, 3703, 3773, 3884
* * *
Section 4. Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require any public school district
to build or renovate any school building in violation of Article III, Section 12 of the
Constitution of Louisiana which prohibits the enactment of local and special laws that
require the repair or building of parish or city schoolhouses or the raising of money for such
purposes.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.